Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 383 Rental of Property — Forcible Entry and Detainer — Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act

383.010.
Recovery of rent — Interest — Persons entitled to and liable for.

Rent may be recovered by distress, attachment or action, and shall bear six percent (6%) interest per annum from the time it is due.

If the owner or holder alienates or assigns his estate, term or the rent thereafter to fall due thereon, the alienee or assignee may recover the rent that falls due thereafter.

The personal representative of a person to whom any rent was due and unpaid at the time of his death shall have the same remedy by action or by distress, for the recovery of the arrears of such rent, that the decedent would have had if living.

A person entitled to rents depending upon the life of another may, notwithstanding the death of the latter, have the same remedy, by action or distress, for the rents in arrears, as he might have had if such person were living.

Rent may be recovered from the lessee or other person owing it, or his assignee or undertenant, or the representative of either by any of the remedies given in this chapter. But, the assignee or subtenant shall be liable only for the rent accrued after his interest began.

The same remedies to recover arrearages of rent due on a lease for life or lives shall be allowed as if the lease were for years.

History.

2299, 2304, 2305, 2318, 2319, 2321.

383.020.
Property subject to distress or attachment for rent — Damages for illegal distraint, attachment, or wrongful removal.

A distress warrant or attachment for rent shall bind, and may be levied upon, any personal property of the original tenant found in the county, and the personal property of the assignee or undertenant found on the leased premises. If the tenant has removed his property to another county, the distress or attachment may be directed to that county.

If property is distrained for any rent not due, or attached for any rent not due or accruing, or taken under any attachment sued out without good cause, the owner of the property may, in an action against the party suing out the warrant of distress or the attachment, recover double damages for the wrongful seizure, and if the property is sold, for double the value thereof.

Any person who wrongfully takes or removes property distrained or attached for rent, from any person having the legal custody of it, shall be liable to the person aggrieved for treble damages, with costs. If the property distrained, after the wrongful taking or removal, comes to the possession of the owner by his wrongful procurement, he shall in like manner be liable to the person aggrieved.

History.

2307, 2312, 2313.

383.030.
Attachment for rent — Procedure.

If any person is liable for rent due not later than one year thereafter, whether payable in money or some other thing, the person to whom the rent is owing or his agent or attorney may file an affidavit in the district court if the amount involved is less than $1,500 and otherwise in the Circuit Court of the county in which the tenement lies, stating that there are reasonable grounds for belief, and that he does believe, that unless an attachment is issued he will lose his rent. The court shall then issue an attachment for the rent against the personal property of the person liable for the rent, to any county the person suing out the attachment may desire. But the attachment shall not issue until the plaintiff has given bond, with good surety, to indemnify the defendant should it appear that the attachment has been wrongfully obtained.

Attachments for rent issued shall be returned before the court issuing the attachment. The proceedings thereon shall be the same as on other attachments according to KRS Chapter 425 and the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The defendant may deny the tenancy or his liability to pay rent, as stated in the affidavit. He may repossess himself of the property by executing bond in a manner similar to that prescribed in KRS Chapter 425, subject to similar proceedings if forfeited, as is prescribed by KRS Chapter 425 and the Rules of Civil Procedure on such a bond.

History.

2302, 2303: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 263; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 311, effective January 2, 1978.

383.040.
Distress for rent due in money. [Repealed.]

383.050.
Sale of distrained property for rent. [Repealed.]

383.060.
Replevy of distrained property — Effect of irregular act after distress. [Repealed.]

383.061.
Action to recover possession of distrained property. [Repealed.]

383.062.
Provisions concerning bonds for distress warrants. [Repealed.]

383.063.
Discharge of levy upon execution of bond — Appraisement. [Repealed.]

383.064.
Motion for judgment by bond obligee — Defenses. [Repealed.]

383.065.
Trial of motion made before justice — Appeal. [Repealed.]

383.066.
Trial of motion made in court. [Repealed.]

383.067.
Judgment against defendants — Execution. [Repealed.]

383.068.
Suspension of warrant upon execution of bond. [Repealed.]

383.070.
Lien for rent — Priority of.

A landlord renting premises for farming or coal mining purposes shall have a lien on the produce of the premises rented and the fixtures, household furniture, and other personal property owned by the tenant, or undertenant, after possession is taken under the lease, but the lien shall not be for more than one (1) year’s rent due and to become due, nor for any rent which has been due for more than eleven (11) months.

Every other landlord shall have a lien on the fixtures, household furniture, and other personal property of the tenant or undertenant, from the time possession is taken under the lease, to secure the landlord in the payment of four (4) months’ rent, due or to become due, but such lien shall not be effective for any rent which is past due for more than one hundred and twenty (120) days.

If sued out within one hundred and twenty (120) days from the time the rent is due, a distress or attachment for rent secured by a lien under subsection (1) or subsection (2) shall, to the extent of four (4) months’ rent, be superior to and satisfied before other liens upon the personal property of a lessee, assignee or undertenant, created while the property is on the leased premises, whether the rent accrued before or after the creation of the other liens. If the rent is for premises leased for coal mining purposes, the superiority given the lien by this subsection shall be to the extent of one (1) year’s rent.

If any property subject to a lien under this section is removed openly from the leased premises, without fraudulent intent, and not returned, the landlord’s lien given by this section shall continue on the property so removed only for fifteen (15) days from the date of its removal. The landlord may enforce his lien against the property wherever found.

History.

2316, 2317.

383.080.
Rights of other lienholders on property of tenant as against landlord.

If, after the commencement of any tenancy, a lien is created on the property upon the leased premises liable for rent, the party making or acquiring the lien may remove the property from the premises only after paying to the person entitled to the rent so much as is in arrears, and securing to him so much as is to become due; what is so paid and secured not being more altogether than rent for the period of time for which the landlord has a lien under KRS

383.070

.

If the property is taken under execution or attachment, the officer shall, out of the proceeds of the property found on the leased premises and levied on or taken by him, make payment of the rent payable in money; in an amount equal to that for which the landlord has a lien under KRS

383.070

, unless a bond of indemnity is executed. The plaintiff in the execution or attachment may compel a sale of the property under his process by executing to the officer a bond of indemnity such as provided for in KRS Ch. 425, and the remedy provided in KRS Ch. 425 and the Rules of Civil Procedure, on a bond of indemnity, shall operate in favor of the person to whom the rent is payable or other claimant of the property on the bond.

All valid liens upon the personal property of a lessee, assignee, or undertenant, created before the property is carried upon the leased premises, shall prevail against a distress warrant or attachment for rent.

History.

2314, 2315, 2316: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 264.

383.085.
Assistance animals — Reasonable accommodations in dwellings — Limitation of liability — Penalty for misrepresentation of an assistance animal.

As used in this section:

“Assistance animal” means an animal that works, provides assistance, or performs tasks for the benefit of a person with a disability, or provides emotional support that alleviates one or more identified symptoms or effects of a person’s disability. This shall include a service animal specifically trained or equipped to perform tasks for a person with a disability, or an emotional support animal that provides support to alleviate one or more identified symptoms or effects of a person’s disability; and

“Therapeutic relationship” means the provision of care, in good faith, to the person with a disability by:

A licensed clinical social worker who holds a valid, unrestricted state license under KRS

335.100

and who maintains an active practice within the state;

A professional counselor who holds a valid, unrestricted state license under KRS

335.525

and who maintains an active practice within the state;

An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a valid, unrestricted state license under KRS

314.042

and who maintains an active practice within the state;

A psychologist who holds a valid, unrestricted state license under KRS

319.050

or

319.053

and who maintains an active practice within the state; or

A physician who holds a valid, unrestricted state license under KRS

311.571

and who maintains an active practice within the state.

An individual who moves from another state may provide documentation from a health-services provider who is licensed in that state, so long as the person with a disability has an ongoing therapeutic relationship with the provider. This definition shall not include a health-care provider described in this paragraph whose primary service is to provide documentation to a person requesting a reasonable accommodation in exchange for a fee.

A person with a disability may submit a request for a reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling. Unless the person’s disability or disability-related need is readily apparent, the person receiving the request may ask the person making the request to provide reliable documentation of the disability-related need for an assistance animal, including documentation from any person with whom the person making the request has or has had a therapeutic relationship.

Unless the person making the request has a disability or disability-related need for an assistance animal that is readily apparent, a person receiving a request for a reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling shall evaluate the request and any reliable supporting documentation to verify the disability-related need for the reasonable accommodation regarding an assistance animal. The person receiving the request may independently verify the authenticity of any supporting documentation.

A person with a disability who is granted a reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling shall comply with the rental agreement or any rules and regulations of the property owner applicable to all residents that do not interfere with an equal opportunity to use and enjoy the dwelling and any common areas of the premises. The person shall not be required to pay a pet fee or deposit or any additional rent to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling, but shall be responsible for any physical damages to the dwelling if residents who maintain pets are responsible for physical damages to the dwelling caused by pets. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any cause of action against any resident for other damages under the laws of the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a landlord shall not be liable for injuries by a person’s assistance animal permitted on the landlord’s property as a reasonable accommodation to assist the person with a disability pursuant to the Fair Housing Act, as amended, 42

U.S.C. secs. 3601

et seq., the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42

U.S.C. secs. 12101

et seq., and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, 29

U.S.C. sec. 701

, or any other federal, state, or local law.

A person commits the offense of misrepresentation of an assistance animal if the person knowingly:

Misrepresents as a part of a request for a reasonable accommodation to maintain an assistance animal in a dwelling that the person has a disability or disability-related need for the use of an assistance animal;

Makes materially false statements for the purpose of obtaining documentation for the use of an assistance animal in housing;

Provides a document to another falsely stating that an animal is an assistance animal for use in housing;

Fits an animal, which is not an assistance animal, with a harness, collar, vest, or sign that the pet is an assistance animal for use in housing;

Engages in fraud, deceit, or dishonesty in providing documentation to a person as a part of a request for the use of an assistance animal in housing; or

Provides documentation as a part of a request for an assistance animal in housing to a person for the primary purpose of obtaining a fee.

Misrepresentation of an assistance animal is a violation with a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 145, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

383.090.
Recovery of rent in absence of written contract.

If there is no written contract, a landlord may, by action, recover reasonable satisfaction for the use and occupation of his land. If on the trial a verbal contract reserving rent in a certain amount is proven, the verbal contract shall be evidence of the amount recoverable.

History.

2300.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint for Accrued Rent Under Implied Promise, Form 309.03.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint for Accrued Rent Under Verbal Contract, Form 309.02.

383.100.
Attornment — When void — When unnecessary.

The attornment of a tenant to a stranger shall be void, unless it be with the consent of the landlord, or pursuant to or in consequence of the judgment of a court.

A conveyance or devise of a rent, reversion or remainder shall be valid without an attornment of the tenant, but no tenant who pays the rent to the grantor before notice of the conveyance shall suffer any damage thereby.

History.

2298.

383.110.
Landlord’s lien for money or supplies furnished — Enforcement of lien.

A landlord shall have a superior lien, against which the tenant shall not be entitled to any exemption, upon the whole crop of the tenant raised upon the leased or rented premises to reimburse the landlord for money or property furnished to the tenant to enable him to raise the crop, or to subsist while carrying out his contract of tenancy. But, the lien of the landlord shall not continue for more than one hundred and twenty (120) days after the expiration of the term. If the property upon which there is a lien is removed openly from the leased premises, without fraudulent intent, and not returned, the landlord shall have a superior lien upon the property so removed for fifteen (15) days from the date of its removal, and may enforce his lien against the property wherever found.

The landlord may enforce the lien given in subsection (1) of this section by distress or attachment, in the manner provided in this chapter for the collection of rent and subject to the same liability.

History.

2323, 2324.

383.120.
Contract for portion of crop for rent — Rights of landlord — Purchasers of crops.

Contracts by which a landlord is to receive a portion of the crop planted or to be planted, as compensation for the use or rent of the land, shall vest in him the right to such a portion of the crop when planted as he has contracted for, though the crop may be planted or raised by a person other than the one contracted with or though a different kind of crop than the one contracted for be planted. For the taking of or injury to any of such crops, the landlord may recover damages against the wrongdoer. The landlord may also have an injunction against any person to prevent the taking or injury of his portion of the crops.

This section does not bar the landlord from his right to the damages against the person contracted with that he may sustain by reason of the land being planted without his assent in a crop other than that contracted for, or not planted at all, or for failure to cultivate the crop in a proper manner.

This section includes a purchaser without notice of a growing crop remaining on the premises, though severed from the land, but does not apply to a purchaser in good faith without notice of a crop, after it has been removed for twenty (20) days from the rented premises on which it was planted.

History.

2325.

383.130.
Tenancy under contract to labor forfeited by breach.

When a tenant enters or holds premises by virtue of a contract in which it is stipulated that he is to labor for his landlord, and he fails to begin to labor, or if, having begun, without good cause fails to comply with his contract, his right to the premises shall at once cease, and he shall abandon them without demand or notice.

History.

2327.

383.140.
Termination of a tenancy at will or by sufferance. [Repealed.]

383.150.
Tenant wrongfully refusing to deliver possession liable for double rent — When notice unnecessary. [Repealed.]

383.160.
Holding over beyond term — Tenancy created by — Rights of parties.

If, by contract, a term or tenancy for a year or more is to expire on a certain day, the tenant shall abandon the premises on that day, unless by express contract he secures the right to remain longer. If without such contract the tenant shall hold over, he shall not thereby acquire any right to hold or remain on the premises for ninety (90) days after said day, and possession may be recovered without demand or notice if proceedings are instituted within that time. But, if proceedings are not instituted within ninety (90) days after the day of expiration, then none shall be allowed until the expiration of one (1) year from the day the term or tenancy expired. At the end of that year the tenant shall abandon the premises without demand or notice, or stand in the same relation to his landlord that he did at the expiration of the term or tenancy aforesaid; and so from year to year, until he abandons the premises, is turned out of possession, or makes a new contract.

If by contract a tenancy for less than a year is to expire on a certain day, the tenant shall abandon the premises on that day unless by express contract he secures the right to remain longer. If without such contract the tenant shall hold over he shall not thereby acquire any right to hold or remain on the premises for thirty (30) days after said day, and the possession may be recovered without demand or notice if proceedings are instituted within that time. But, if proceedings are not instituted within thirty (30) days after the day of expiration, then none shall be allowed until the expiration of sixty (60) days from the day the tenancy expired. At the end of that sixty (60) days the tenant shall abandon the premises without demand or notice, or stand in the same relation to his landlord that he did at the expiration of the tenancy aforesaid; and so on from time to time until he abandons the premises, is turned out of possession, or makes a new contract.

History.

2295, 2296.

383.170.
Buildings destroyed without fault of tenant — Replacement of, and rent on.

Unless the contrary is expressly provided for in the written contract, the agreement of a lessee that he will repair or leave the premises in repair shall not bind him to erect similar buildings if, without his fault or neglect, the buildings are destroyed by fire or other casualty. A tenant, unless he otherwise contracts, shall not be liable for the rent for the remainder of his term of any building leased by him, and destroyed during the term by fire or other casualty without his fault or neglect.

History.

2297.

383.180.
Conveyance of greater estate than owned, and assignment of tenancy — Effect.

A conveyance made by a tenant for years, purporting to grant a greater estate than he has, shall not work a forfeiture of his estate, but shall pass to the grantee all the estate which the tenant could lawfully convey.

Unless the landlord consents thereto in writing, every assignment, or transfer of his term or interests in the premises, or any portion thereof, by a tenant at will or by sufferance, or one who has a term less than two (2) years, shall operate as a forfeiture to the landlord. The landlord, after having given the occupant ten (10) days’ written notice to quit, may reenter and take possession, or may, by writ of forcible entry or detainer, or the proper procedure, recover possession of the premises from any occupant.

History.

2291, 2292.

383.190.
Death of tenant for life — Effect on lease of tenant for year.

If a tenant for life lets the land to another for the year and dies after March 1, the lessee shall hold the land until December 31 following, but shall pay a reasonable rent from the death of the tenant for life.

History.

3864.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Apportionment of rents on death of holder of estate, KRS

395.360

.

Holder of estate, effect of death of, KRS

395.340

,

395.350

.

383.195.
Termination of tenancy at will or by sufferance.

In those jurisdictions where the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act is not in effect, a tenancy at will or by sufferance may be terminated by the landlord giving one (1) month’s notice, in writing, to the tenant requiring him to remove.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 176, § 44, effective July 13, 1984.